Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-174
Task Force for Building Renewal; established; purpose; consultants; appointment; how selected.

There is hereby established the Task Force for Building Renewal to carry out the Deferred Building Renewal Act. The Director of Administrative Services shall appoint an administrator as the chief officer of the task force. The administrator shall retain not more than four consultants to assist him or her in the administration of the Deferred Building Renewal Act. Each task force member shall be selected on the basis of his or her ability to administer and accomplish efficient building maintenance and shall have knowledge of and experience in the contracting of construction projects and the maintaining of buildings. Members shall be selected so that the task force represents diversified expertise needed for maintenance judgments and, if practical, each member should reside at a location that allows efficient visitation of state-owned buildings.

Laws 1977, LB 309, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 835, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 8;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 16.